Utah statutes.
31A-19a-103.   Exemptions.

(1)  The commissioner may by rule exempt from any or all of the provisions of this chapter:

(a)  any person;

(b)  a class of persons; or

(c)  a market segment.

(2)  The exemption described in Subsection (1) shall be given only if and to the extent that the commissioner finds the application of the provisions of this chapter to that person or group is unnecessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 130, 1999 General Session

